Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1327
Act, severability.

If any provision of sections 69-1301 to 69-1329 or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of sections 69-1301 to 69-1329 are severable.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 27, p. 2490.